en: natural caramel flavouring
ca: caramel natural
de: natürliches Karamellaroma
es: Saborizante de caramelo natural, caramelo natural
fi: luontainen karamelliaromi
fr: arôme naturel de caramel
hr: prirodna aroma karamele
hu: természetes karamella aroma, természetes karamell aroma
it: aroma naturale di caramello
nl: natuurlijk caramelaroma
pl: naturalny aromat karmelowy
pt: aroma natural de caramelo

fr: arôme naturel de céleri
de: natürliches Selleriearoma
es: sabor natural de apio
fi: luontainen selleriaromi
hu: természetes zeller aroma
it: aroma naturale di sedano
nl: natuurlijk selderijaroma
pl: naturalny aromat selera
pt: sabor natural de aipo

en: natural carrot flavouring
de: natürliches Möhrenaroma, natürliches Möhren-Aroma, natürliches Karottenaroma, natürliches Karotten-Aroma
fi: luontainen porkkana-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de carotte
hr: prirodna aroma mrkve
hu: természetes répa aroma
it: aroma naturale di carota

en: onion flavouring
bg: луков аромат
ca: Sabor de ceba
cs: Cibulová příchuť
da: løgsmag
de: Zwiebelaroma
es: Sabor a cebolla
fi: sipuliaromi
fr: Arôme d'oignon
hr: aroma luka
hu: hagyma aroma
it: Aroma di cipolla
nl: uiensmaak
pl: aromat cebulowy
pt: Sabor de cebola
ro: Aromă de ceapă
ru: луковый аромат
sv: löksmak
tr: soğan aroması

en: natural onion flavouring
de: natürliches Zwiebelaroma
es: aroma natural de cebolla
fi: luontainen sipuliaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'oignon
hr: prirodna aroma luka
hu: természetes hagyma aroma
it: Aroma di cipolla naturale
nl: natuurlijk uienaroma
pl: naturalny aromat cebulowy
pt: sabor natural de cebola
ro: Aromă naturală de ceapă
ru: натуральный луковый аромат
sv: naturlig löksmak
tr: doğal soğan aroması

en: vanilla flavouring
bg: аромат на ванилия, ванилов аромат, ароматизант ванилия
ca: Aroma de vainilla, aromes de vainilla
cs: Vanilková příchuť
da: vaniljearoma, vanilijaroma
de: VanilleAroma
es: aroma de vainilla
fi: vanilja-aromi
fr: arôme vanille, arôme de vanille
he: חומר טעם וניל, חומרי טעם וניל
hr: aroma vanilije, aroma vanilin
hu: vanília aroma, vaníliaaroma
it: aroma di vaniglia
lt: vanilės kvapioji medžiaga
lv: vaniļas aromatizētājs
nl: vanillearoma, vanille aroma
pl: aromat waniliowy
pt: aroma baunilha
ro: aromă de vanilie
ru: ароматизатор идентичный натуральному-ванилин
sv: vaniljarom

en: natural vanilla flavouring
bg: натурален ароматизант ванилия, естествен ванилов аромат
ca: Aroma natural de vainilla, aromes naturals de vainilla
cs: Přírodní vanilková příchuť
da: naturlig vanillearoma, naturlig vaniljearoma
de: natürliches Vanillearoma, natürliches Vanille-Aroma
es: aroma natural de vainilla
et: looduslik vanillimaitseaine
fi: luontainen vanilja-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de vanille, arôme naturel vanille, arômes naturels de vanille
he: חומרי טעם וניל טבעי, חומר טעם וניל טבעי
hr: prirodna aroma vanilije
hu: természetes vanília aroma
it: aroma naturale di vaniglia, aroma naturale vaniglia
lv: dabīgs vaniļas aromatizētājs
nb: naturlig vanilijarom
nl: natuurlijk vanillearoma, natuurlijk vanille aroma, natuurlijke vanille aroma
pl: naturalny aromat wanilii, naturalny aromat waniliowy
pt: aroma de baunilha natural, aromatizante de baunilha natural, aroma natural de baunilha
ro: aromă naturală de vanilie, aromă de vanilie naturală
sv: naturlig vaniljarom, naturlig vanilijarom

en: natural organic vanilla flavouring
da: økologisk naturlig vanillearoma
de: natürliches biologisches Vanillearoma
es: aroma natural de vainilla ecólogica
fi: luontainen luomu vanilja-aromi
hr: prirodna organska aroma vanilije
hu: természetes bio vanília aroma
it: aroma naturale di vaniglia biologica
nl: natuurlijk aroma van bio vanille
pt: aroma natural de baunilha biológica

en: bourbon vanilla flavouring
bg: бурбон ванилия ароматизант
ca: aroma de vainilla de bourbon
cs: bourbon vanilková příchuť
da: bourbon vaniljearoma
de: Bourbon-Vanillearoma
es: aroma de vainilla de bourbon
fi: bourbon-vanilja-aromi
fr: arôme de vanille bourbon
hr: aroma bourbon vanilije
hu: bourbon vanília aroma
it: aroma di vaniglia di bourbon
lt: bourbon vanilės kvapioji medžiaga
nl: bourbon vanillearoma
pl: aromat wanilii bourbon, aromat waniliowy bourbon
pt: aroma de baunilha de bourbon
ro: aromă de vanilie bourbon
ru: бурбон ваниль ароматизатор
sv: bourbon-vaniljarom

en: Bourbon vanilla natural flavouring
de: natürliches Bourbon Vanille-Aroma, naturliches Bourbon Vanille Aroma, natürliches Bourbon-Vanillearoma
fi: luontainen Bourbon vanilja-aromi, luontainen bourbonvaniljaaromi
fr: arôme naturel de vanille bourbon
hr: prirodna aroma bourbon vanilije
it: aroma naturale di vaniglia Bourbon
pl: naturalny aromat wanilii bourbon
sv: naturlig bourbon-vaniljarom

fr: arôme naturel de vanille de madagascar
de: natürliches Vanillearoma aus Madagaskar
es: aroma natural de vainilla de Madagascar
it: aroma naturale di vaniglia di Madagascar
nl: natuurlijk vanillearoma uit Madagaskar
pt: aroma natural de baunilha de Madagascar

en: vanillin
ar: فانيلين
be: Ванілін
bg: Ванилин
ca: vanillina
cs: Vanilin
da: vanillin
de: Vanillin
el: βανιλλίνη, βανιλίνη
eo: Vanilino
es: vainillina
et: vanilliin
eu: Bainilina
fa: وانیلین
fi: vanilliini, vaniliini, vanilliinia
fr: vanilline, vaniline
he: ונילין
hr: vanilin
hu: vanillin
hy: Վանիլին
it: vanillina
ja: バニリン
kk: Ванилин
ko: 바닐린
ky: Ванилин
lt: vanilinas
lv: vanillīns
mk: Ванилин
ms: Vanilin
nb: vanillin
nl: vanilline
pl: Wanilina
pt: vanilina, vanillina
ru: Ванилин, ароматизатор ванилин
sr: vanilin
sv: vanillin
th: วานิลลิน
tr: Vanilin
uk: Ванілін
uz: Vanilin
zh: 香草醛

en: ethylvanillin, ethyl vanillin
de: Ethylvanillin
es: etilvainillina, etil vainillina
fr: Éthylvanilline
hr: etilvanilin
it: etilvanillina
nl: ethylvanilline
pl: etylowanilina
pt: etilvanilina
ru: этилванилин
sv: etylvanillin

en: natural vanilla flavouring with other natural flavourings
de: natürliches Vanillearoma mit anderen natürlichen Aromen
es: aroma natural de vainilla con otros aromas naturales
fi: luontainen vanilja-aromi ja muita luontaisia aromeja, luontainen vanilja-aromi ja muut luontaiset aromit
fr: arôme naturel de vanille avec d'autres arômes naturels, arôme naturel de vanille avec autres arômes naturels
hr: prirodna aroma vanilije s drugim prirodnim aromama
hu: természetes vanília aroma más természetes aromákkal
it: aroma naturale di vaniglia con altri aromi naturali
nl: natuurlijk vanillearoma met andere natuurlijke aroma's, natuurlijk vanille aroma en andere natuurlijke aroma's
pl: naturalny aromat waniliowy z innymi naturalnymi aromatami, naturalny aromat waniliowy z innym naturalnym aromatem
sv: naturlig vaniljarom med andra naturliga aromer

en: natural thyme flavouring
de: natürliches Thymianaroma, natürliches Thymian-Aroma
fi: luontainen timjamiaromi
fr: arôme naturel de thym
hr: prirodna aroma timijana
hu: természetes kakukkfű aroma
it: aroma naturale di timo
pl: naturalny aromat z tymianku

en: natural tea flavouring
de: natürlich aromatisierter Tee, natürliches Teearoma, natürliches Tee-Aroma
es: sabor a té natural
fi: luontainen teearomi
fr: arôme naturel de thé
hr: prirodne arome čaja
hu: természetes tea aroma
it: aroma naturale di tè

fr: arôme naturel de muscade
es: aroma natural de nuez moscada
hu: természetes szerecsendió aroma
it: aroma naturale di noce moscata
nl: natuurlijk muskaataroma
pl: naturalny aromat gałki muszkatołowej
pt: sabor natural de noz-moscada
sv: naturlig muskotssmak

en: mint flavouring
de: Minzgeschmack
es: Sabor menta
fi: minttuaromi
fr: arôme de menthe
hr: aroma mente
hu: menta aroma
it: Aroma di menta
nl: muntsmaak
pl: aromat mięty
pt: sabor de menta
sv: mintsmak

en: natural mint flavouring, natural mint flavours, natural mints flavor
bg: естествен аромат мента
de: natürliches Minzaroma
es: sabor natural a menta, aroma natural de menta
fi: luontainen minttuaromi, luontaisia minttuaromeja, luontaiset minttuaromit
fr: arômes naturels de menthe, arôme naturel de menthe, arôme naturel de menthes
hr: prirodna aroma mente
hu: természetes menta aroma
it: aroma naturale di menta, aroma di menta naturale
nl: natuurlijk muntsmaak, natuurlijk muntaroma
pl: naturalny aromat mięty
pt: sabor natural de menta
sv: naturlig mintsmak

en: peppermint flavouring
bg: ароматизант ментол
de: Pfefferminzgeschmack
fi: piparminttuaromi
fr: arôme de menthe poivrée
hr: aroma paprene metvice
hu: borsmenta aroma
it: aroma di menta piperita
pl: aromat mięty pieprzowej
sv: pepparmintsarom